test/src/morphology/myv-tests-adj.yaml
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: ашосонсетне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: ашосонсетнень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: ашосонсетнень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Def: ашосонсетненень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Def: ашосонсетненень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: ашосонсетнеде
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: ашосонсетнеде
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: ашосонсетнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: ашосонсетнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: ашосонсетнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: ашосонсетнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: ашосонсетнес
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: ашосонсетнес
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: ашосонсетнева
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: ашосонсетнева
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: ашосонсетнекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: ашосонсетнекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: ашосонсетнев
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: ашосонсетнев
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: ашосонсетневтеме
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: ашосонсетневтеме
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: ашосонсетнешка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: ашосонсетнешка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: ашосонсетненек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: ашосонсетненек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: ашостонседе
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: ашостонседе
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: ашостонсекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: ашостонсекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: ашостонсесь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: ашостонсесь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: ашостонсенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: ашостонсенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+Def: ашостонсентень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+Def: ашостонсентень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: ашостонседенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: ашостонседенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: ашостонсесэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: ашостонсесэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: ашостонсестэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: ашостонсестэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: ашостонсеванть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: ашостонсеванть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: ашостонсевтементь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: ашостонсевтементь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: ашостонсешканть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: ашостонсешканть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: ашостонсексэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: ашостонсексэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: ашостонсетне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: ашостонсетне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: ашостонсетнень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: ашостонсетнень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Def: ашостонсетненень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Def: ашостонсетненень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: ашостонсетнеде
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: ашостонсетнеде
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: ашостонсетнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: ашостонсетнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: ашостонсетнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: ашостонсетнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: ашостонсетнес
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: ашостонсетнес
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: ашостонсетнева
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: ашостонсетнева
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: ашостонсетнекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: ашостонсетнекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: ашостонсетнев
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: ашостонсетнев
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: ашостонсетневтеме
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: ашостонсетневтеме
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: ашостонсетнешка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: ашостонсетнешка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: ашостонсетненек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: ашостонсетненек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: ашованкседе
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: ашованкседе
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: ашованксекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: ашованксекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: ашованксесь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: ашованксесь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: ашованксенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: ашованксенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+Def: ашованксентень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+Def: ашованксентень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: ашованкседенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: ашованкседенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: ашованксесэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: ашованксесэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: ашованксестэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: ашованксестэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: ашованксеванть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: ашованксеванть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: ашованксевтементь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: ашованксевтементь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: ашованксешканть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: ашованксешканть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: ашованксексэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: ашованксексэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: ашованксетне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: ашованксетне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: ашованксетнень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: ашованксетнень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Def: ашованксетненень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Def: ашованксетненень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: ашованксетнеде
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def: ашованксетнеде
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: ашованксетнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def: ашованксетнесэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: ашованксетнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def: ашованксетнестэ
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: ашованксетнес
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def: ашованксетнес
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: ашованксетнева
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: ашованксетнева
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: ашованксетнекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def: ашованксетнекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: ашованксетнев
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def: ашованксетнев
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: ашованксетневтеме
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def: ашованксетневтеме
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: ашованксетнешка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def: ашованксетнешка
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: ашованксетненек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def: ашованксетненек
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: ашотседе
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef: ашотседе
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: ашотсекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef: ашотсекс
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: ашотсесь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def: ашотсесь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: ашотсенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def: ашотсенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+Def: ашотсентень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+Def: ашотсентень
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: ашотседенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def: ашотседенть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: ашотсесэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def: ашотсесэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: ашотсестэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def: ашотсестэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: ашотсеванть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def: ашотсеванть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: ашотсевтементь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def: ашотсевтементь
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: ашотсевтомонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def: ашотсевтомонть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: ашотсексэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def: ашотсексэнть
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: ашотсетне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def: ашотсетне
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Px2Sg+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def: ашотсетнень
